Washington statutes.
RCW 18.92.115

Reexamination—Fee.

Any applicant who shall fail to secure the required grade in his or her first examination may take the next regular veterinary examination. The fee for reexamination shall be determined by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250.

[ 2011 c 336 s 499; 1991 c 3 s 244; 1985 c 7 s 71; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 82; 1967 ex.s. c 50 s 7; 1959 c 92 s 8; 1941 c 71 s 10; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 10040-10. Prior: 1907 c 124 s 17. Formerly RCW 18.92.090, part.]